Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-712.02
Public records; claimants before United States Department of Veterans Affairs; certified copies free of charge.

When it is requested by any claimant before the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or his or her agent or attorney that certified copies of any public record be furnished for the proper and effective presentation of any such claim in such department, the officer in charge of such public records shall furnish or cause to be furnished to such claimant or his or her agent or attorney a certified copy thereof free of charge.

Laws 1961, c. 454, § 4, p. 1384;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 30.